New York, session 2025-2026, A176.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 170-k 2 to read as follows: 3 § 170-k. Eligibility for state or local public benefits regardless of 4 immigration status. A state agency may, at its discretion, provide state 5 or local public benefits, as defined by the federal personal responsi- 6 bility and work opportunity reconciliation act 8 U.S.C. 1621 or any 7 successor provision, to persons who, but for such federal law restrict- 8 ing eligibility for such benefits based on immigration status, would be 9 otherwise eligible for such benefits from such agency. For the purposes 10 of this section, a "state agency" shall mean any department, bureau, 11 commission, board, division, office, or agency of the state. 12 § 2. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new section 13 99-h-1 to read as follows: 14 § 99-h-1. Eligibility for state or local benefits regardless of immi- 15 gration status. A municipal corporation may, at its discretion, provide 16 state or local public benefits, as defined by the federal personal 17 responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act 8 U.S.C. 1621 or 18 any successor provision, to persons who, but for such federal law 19 restricting eligibility for such benefits based on immigration status, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00165-02-6 A. 176--A 2 1 would be otherwise eligible for such benefits from such municipal corpo- 2 ration. For purposes of this section, a "municipal corporation" shall 3 mean a county, city, town, village, school district, or board of cooper- 4 ative educational services of this state or a board of higher education 5 in a city having a population of one million or more. 6 § 3. Article 9 of the public authorities law is amended by adding a 7 new title 13 to read as follows: 8 TITLE 13 9 STATE OR LOCAL PUBLIC BENEFITS 10 Section 2988. Eligibility for state or local public benefits regardless 11 of immigration status. 12 § 2988. Eligibility for state or local public benefits regardless of 13 immigration status. A state authority or local authority may, at its 14 discretion, provide state or local public benefits, as defined by the 15 federal personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act 16 8 U.S.C. 1621 or any successor provision, to persons who, but for such 17 federal law restricting eligibility for such benefits based on immi- 18 gration status, would be otherwise eligible for such benefits from such 19 state or local authority. 20 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.